Illinois, session 104th, SB721.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/1)  (from Ch. 73, par. 613)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the Illinois Insurance Code.9(Source: P.A. 96-328, eff. 8-11-09.)